el: Συμβατή βίδα ποδηλασίας: Crankbrothers; Επίπεδο/πλατφόρμα (χωρίς σχαράκι); Look Delta (3 βιδών); Look KEO (3 βιδών); SPD (2 βιδών); SPD-SL (3 βιδών); Speedplay (4 βιδών); Time ATAC; Γενικής χρήσης (2 και 3 βιδών); Άλλο
it: Tacchetta da ciclismo compatibile: Crankbrothers; Flat/piattaforma (senza tacchette); Look Delta (3 bulloni); Look KEO (3 bulloni); SPD (2 bulloni); SPD-SL (3 bulloni); Speedplay (4 bulloni); Time ATAC; Universale (2 e 3 bulloni); Altro
da: Kompatibel cykelklampe: Crankbrothers; Flad/platform (ingen klampe); Look Delta (3-bolt); Look KEO (3-bolt); SPD (2-bolt); SPD-SL (3-bolt); Speedplay (4-bolt); Time ATAC; Universal (2- & 3-bolt); Andet
bg-BG: Съвместим автомат за велосипедни обувки: Crankbrothers; Плоски/платформа (без парчета); Look Delta (с 3 болта); Look KEO (с 3 болта); SPD (с 2 болта); SPD-SL (с 3 болта); Speedplay (с 4 болта); Time ATAC; Универсални (с 2 и 3 болта); Друго
ru: Совместимый велосипедный шип: Crankbrothers; Плоские/платформенные (без шипов); Look Delta (3 винта); Look KEO (3 винта); SPD (2 винта); SPD-SL (3 винта); Speedplay (4 винта); Time ATAC; Универсальные (2 и 3 винта); Другое
nl: Compatibel fietsschoenplaatje: Crankbrothers; Plat/platform (geen schoenplaatje); Look Delta (3-bouts); Look KEO (3-bouts); SPD (2-bouts); SPD-SL (3-bouts); Speedplay (4-bouts); Time ATAC; Universeel (2- en 3-bouts); Overig
fr: Cale de pédale de vélo compatible: Crankbrothers; Plat / plateforme (sans cale); Look Delta (3 vis); Look KEO (3 vis); SPD (2 vis); SPD-SL (3 vis); Speedplay (4 vis); Time ATAC; Universel (2 et 3 vis); Autre
es: Sistema de calas compatible: Crankbrothers; Plano/plataforma (sin cala); Look Delta (3 tornillos); Look Keo (3 tornillos); SPD (2 tornillos); SPD-SL (3 tornillos); Speedplay (4 tornillos); Time ATAC; Universal (2 y 3 tornillos); Otra
ko: 호환 사이클링 클릿: Crankbrothers; 플랫/플랫폼(클릿 없음); Look Delta(3볼트); Look KEO(3볼트); SPD(2볼트); SPD-SL(3볼트); Speedplay(4볼트); Time ATAC; 범용(2볼트 및 3볼트); 기타
en: Compatible cycling cleat: Crankbrothers; Flat/platform (no cleat); Look Delta (3-bolt); Look KEO (3-bolt); SPD (2-bolt); SPD-SL (3-bolt); Speedplay (4-bolt); Time ATAC; Universal (2- & 3-bolt); Other
hr-HR: Kompatibilne biciklističke kopačke: Crankbrothers; Ravne / s platformom (bez pločica); Look Delta (3 vijka); Look KEO (3 vijka); SPD (2 vijka); SPD-SL (3 vijka); Speedplay (4 vijka); Time ATAC; Univerzalno (2 i 3 vijka); Ostalo
sl-SI: Združljivi kolesarski vpenjalni čevlji: Crankbrothers; Ravna pedala/platforma (brez blokeja); Look Delta (3 vijaki); Look KEO (3 vijaki); SPD (2 vijaka); SPD-SL (3 vijaki); Speedplay (4 vijaki); Time ATAC; Univerzalno (2 in 3 vijaki); Drugo
pt-PT: Taco de ciclismo compatível: Crankbrothers; Plano/plataforma (sem travessa); Look Delta (3 parafusos); Look KEO (3 parafusos); SPD (2 parafusos); SPD-SL (3 parafusos); Speedplay (4 parafusos); Time ATAC; Universal (2 e 3 parafusos); Outra
pt-BR: Taco de ciclismo compatível: Crankbrothers; Plano/plataforma (sem taco); Look Delta (3 parafusos); Look KEO (3 parafusos); SPD (2 parafusos); SPD-SL (3 parafusos); Speedplay (4 parafusos); Time ATAC; Universal (2 e 3 parafusos); Outro
cs: Kompatibilní cyklistické zarážky: Crankbrothers; Ploché/platforma (bez zarážky); Look Delta (3šroubové); Look KEO (3šroubové); SPD (2šroubové); SPD-SL (3šroubové); Speedplay (4šroubové); Time ATAC; Univerzální (2- a 3šroubové); Jiné
pl: Kompatybilny blok rowerowy: Crankbrothers; Płaskie/platformowe (bez bloków); Look Delta (na 3 śruby); Look KEO (na 3 śruby); SPD (na 2 śruby); SPD-SL (na 3 śruby); Speedplay (na 4 śruby); Time ATAC; Uniwersalne (na 2 i 3 śruby); Inne
vi: Đế giày đạp xe tương thích: Crankbrothers; Phẳng/bàn đạp (không can); Look Delta (3 chốt); Look KEO (3 chốt); SPD (2 chốt); SPD-SL (3 chốt); Speedplay (4 chốt); Time ATAC; Đa năng (2 & 3 chốt); Khác
nb: Kompatibel sykkelsko: Crankbrothers; Flat/plattform (ingen kloss); Look Delta (3-bolts); Look KEO (3-bolts); SPD (2-bolts); SPD-SL (3-bolts); Speedplay (4-bolts); Time ATAC; Universell (2- og 3-bolts); Annet
hu: Kompatibilis kerékpáros stopli: Crankbrothers; Lapos/platform (stopli nélkül); Look Delta (3 csavaros); Look KEO (3 csavaros); SPD (2 csavaros); SPD-SL (3 csavaros); Speedplay (4 csavaros); Time ATAC; Univerzális (2 és 3 csavaros); Egyéb
th: ตัวยึดรองเท้าปั่นจักรยานที่ใช้ร่วมกันได้: Crankbrothers; บันไดเรียบ/บันไดแพลตฟอร์ม (ไม่มีคลีต); Look Delta (3 โบลต์); Look KEO (3 โบลต์); SPD (2 โบลต์); SPD-SL (3 โบลต์); Speedplay (4 โบลต์); Time ATAC; อเนกประสงค์ (2 และ 3 โบลต์); อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Suderinami dviračių klipsai: Crankbrothers; Plokšti / platforminiai (be plokštelių); Look Delta (3 varžtų); Look KEO (3 varžtų); SPD (2 varžtų); SPD-SL (3 varžtų); Speedplay (4 varžtų); Time ATAC; Universalūs (2 ir 3 varžtų); Kita
tr: Uyumlu bisiklet pedal kilidi: Crankbrothers; Düz/platform (kilit yok); Look Delta (3 cıvatalı); Look KEO (3 cıvatalı); SPD (2 cıvatalı); SPD-SL (3 cıvatalı); Speedplay (4 cıvatalı); Time ATAC; Evrensel (2 ve 3 cıvatalı); Diğer
sk-SK: Kompatibilná cyklistická zarážka: Crankbrothers; Ploché/platformové (bez zarážky); Look Delta (3-skrutkové); Look KEO (3-skrutkové); SPD (2-skrutkové); SPD-SL (3-skrutkové); Speedplay (4-skrutkové); Time ATAC; Univerzálne (2 a 3-skrutkové); Iné
ro-RO: Crampoane de ciclism compatibile: Crankbrothers; Plat/platformă (fără plăcuțe); Look Delta (3 șuruburi); Look KEO (3 șuruburi); SPD (2 șuruburi); SPD-SL (3 șuruburi); Speedplay (4 șuruburi); Time ATAC; Universal (2 și 3 șuruburi); Altele
zh-TW: 相容的自行車鎖片: Crankbrothers; 平踏 / 平台式 (無卡踏扣片); Look Delta (3 孔); Look KEO (3 孔); SPD (2 孔); SPD-SL (3 孔); Speedplay (4 孔); Time ATAC; 通用 (2 孔與 3 孔); 其他
fi: Yhteensopiva pyöräilyklossi: Crankbrothers; Tasainen/avopoljin (ei klossia); Look Delta (3-pulttinen); Look KEO (3-pulttinen); SPD (2-pulttinen); SPD-SL (3-pulttinen); Speedplay (4-pulttinen); Time ATAC; Universaali (2- ja 3-pulttinen); Muu
de: Kompatibles Fahrrad-Cleat-System: Crankbrothers; Flach/Plattform (ohne Cleat); Look Delta (3-Loch); Look KEO (3-Loch); SPD (2-Loch); SPD-SL (3-Loch); Speedplay (4-Loch); Time ATAC; Universal (2- & 3-Loch); Sonstige
zh-CN: 适配的自行车锁片: Crankbrothers; 平踏板（无锁片）; Look Delta（3 孔）; Look KEO（3 孔）; SPD（2 孔）; SPD-SL（3 孔）; Speedplay（4 孔）; Time ATAC; 通用（2 孔和 3 孔）; 其他
ja: 互換性のあるサイクリングクリート: Crankbrothers; フラット / プラットフォーム (クリートなし); Look Delta (3つ穴); Look KEO (3つ穴); SPD (2つ穴); SPD-SL (3つ穴); Speedplay (4つ穴); Time ATAC; 汎用 (2つ穴と3つ穴); その他
sv: Kompatibla cykelbroddar: Crankbrothers; Platt/plattform (ingen kloss); Look Delta (3-bult); Look KEO (3-bult); SPD (2-bult); SPD-SL (3-bult); Speedplay (4-bult); Time ATAC; Universell (2- & 3-bult); Annat